src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-ngawo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Pronoun - ӈамгэ: # Noun 'what' - partial paradigm /Type 24a/
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: ӈамгэ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc: ӈамгэмʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen: ӈамгэʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat: ӈамгэнʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc: ӈамгэхэна
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl: ӈамгэхэд
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Pros: ӈамгэвна
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Nom: ӈамгэхэʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Acc: ӈамгэхэʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Gen: ӈамгэхэʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom: ӈамгэˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc: ӈаво
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen: ӈавоˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Dat: ӈамгэхэˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc: ӈамгэхэˮна
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abl: ӈамгэхэт
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Pros: ӈавоˮмана    

     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Tra: ӈамгэӈэ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Car: ӈамгэсиˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Equ: ӈамгэдаремʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Equ+Lat: ӈамгэдаревʼ


# Possessive forms 

     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ӈамгэв 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ӈамгэр  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ӈамгэда 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ӈамгэмиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ӈамгэриʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ӈамгэдиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ӈамгэваˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ӈамгэраˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ӈамгэдоʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: ӈамгэв   
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: ӈамгэми  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ӈамгэмд  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ӈамгэмда 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ӈамгэмиʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ӈамгэмдиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ӈамгэмдиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ӈамгэваˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ӈамгэмдаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ӈамгэмдоʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ӈамгэн   
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ӈамгэни  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ӈамгэнд  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ӈамгэнда 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ӈамгэниʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: ӈамгэндиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: ӈамгэндиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ӈамгэнаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ӈамгэндаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ӈамгэндоʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: ӈамгэхэн 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ӈамгэхэнд  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ӈамгэхэнда 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ӈамгэхэниʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ӈамгэхэндиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ӈамгэхэндиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ӈамгэхэнаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ӈамгэхэндаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ӈамгэхэндоʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ӈамгэхэнан
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ӈамгэхэнанд  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ӈамгэхэнанда 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ӈамгэхэнаниʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ӈамгэхэнандиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ӈамгэхэнандиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ӈамгэхэнанаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ӈамгэхэнандаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ӈамгэхэнандоʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: ӈамгэхэдан
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ӈамгэхэданд  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ӈамгэхэданда 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: ӈамгэхэданиʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ӈамгэхэдандиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ӈамгэхэдандиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: ӈамгэхэданаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ӈамгэхэдандаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ӈамгэхэдандоʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: ӈамгэвнан
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ӈамгэвнанд  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ӈамгэвнанда 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ӈамгэвнаниʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ӈамгэвнандиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ӈамгэвнандиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ӈамгэвнанаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ӈамгэвнандаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ӈамгэвнандоʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Nom+PxSg1: ӈамгэхэюн  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ӈамгэхэюд  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ӈамгэхэюда 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ӈамгэхэюниʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Nom+PxDu2: ӈамгэхэюдиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Nom+PxDu3: ӈамгэхэюдиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ӈамгэхэюнаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ӈамгэхэюдаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ӈамгэхэюдоʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Acc+PxSg1: ӈамгэхэюн  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ӈамгэхэюд  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ӈамгэхэюда 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ӈамгэхэюниʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Acc+PxDu2: ӈамгэхэюдиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Acc+PxDu3: ӈамгэхэюдиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ӈамгэхэюнаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ӈамгэхэюдаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ӈамгэхэюдоʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Gen+PxSg1: ӈамгэхэюн  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ӈамгэхэют  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ӈамгэхэюта 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ӈамгэхэюниʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Gen+PxDu2: ӈамгэхэютиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Gen+PxDu3: ӈамгэхэютиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ӈамгэхэюнаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ӈамгэхэютаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ӈамгэхэютоʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ӈавон   
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ӈавод   
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ӈавода  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ӈавониʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ӈаводиʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ӈаводиʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ӈавонаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ӈаводаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ӈаводоʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: ӈавон   
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ӈавод   
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ӈавода  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ӈавониʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ӈаводиʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ӈаводиʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ӈавонаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ӈаводаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ӈаводоʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: ӈавоˮн  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ӈавот   
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ӈавота  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ӈавоˮниʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ӈавотиʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ӈавотиʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ӈавоˮнаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ӈавотаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ӈавотоʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ӈамгэхэˮн 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ӈамгэхэт 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ӈамгэхэта 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ӈамгэхэˮниʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: ӈамгэхэтиʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ӈамгэхэтиʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ӈамгэхэˮнаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ӈамгэхэтаˮ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ӈамгэхэтоʼ 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ӈамгэхэˮнан  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ӈамгэхэˮнат  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ӈамгэхэˮната 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: ӈамгэхэˮнаниʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: ӈамгэхэˮнатиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ӈамгэхэˮнатиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ӈамгэхэˮнанаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ӈамгэхэˮнатаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ӈамгэхэˮнатоʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: ӈамгэхэтан 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ӈамгэхэтат 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: ӈамгэхэтата 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: ӈамгэхэтаниʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: ӈамгэхэтатиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: ӈамгэхэтатиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: ӈамгэхэтанаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: ӈамгэхэтатаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: ӈамгэхэтатоʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: ӈавоˮманан  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ӈавоˮманат  
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ӈавоˮманата 
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ӈавоˮмананиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ӈавоˮманатиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ӈавоˮманатиʼ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ӈавоˮмананаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ӈавоˮманатаˮ
     ӈамгэ+Pron+Interr+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ӈавоˮманатоʼ
